Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 9

Scrap Metal Dealers

62-9-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce and insurance or the commissioner's designee or, in the event of the commissioner's or designee's absence or vacancy in the office of the commissioner, the deputy commissioner;

“Department” means the department of commerce and insurance;

“Licensed HVAC contractor” means a person holding a license from the state board for licensing contractors with a CMC, MC, CMC-C, or MC-C classification;

“Person” means an individual, association, partnership, corporation, or any other legally cognizable organization or entity;

“Scrap metal” means any ferrous or nonferrous metal that is no longer used for its original purpose and is capable of being processed for reuse by a metal recycling facility, including, but not limited to, iron, brass, wire, cable, copper, bronze, aluminum, platinum, lead, solder, steel, stainless steel, catalytic converters or other similar obsolete ferrous or nonferrous metals, but shall not include recyclable aluminum cans; and

“Scrap metal dealer” means a person who buys, exchanges or deals in scrap metal or an employee or agent of that dealer who has the express or implied authority to buy, exchange or deal in scrap metal on behalf of the dealer.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1; 2012, ch. 969, § 3; 2017, ch. 414, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2012, ch. 969, § 8 provided that the commissioner of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Regulation of scrap jewelry and metal dealers, title 38, ch. 1, part 2.

Burglary and related offenses, title 39, ch. 14, part 4.

Criminal enhancement factors, § 40-35-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Junk Dealers, §§ 1, 2, 8.

Attorney General Opinions. A person who buys gold or other precious metals in the form of used jewelry is not regulated by T.C.A. §§ 62-9-101—62-9-113 but rather is governed by T.C.A. §§ 38-1-201—38-1-205. Buyers and dealers of scrap jewelry and precious metals must register with the chief of police and sheriff of each county in which they conduct such activity pursuant to T.C.A. § 38-1-201(a). OAG 12-98, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (10/29/12).

62-9-102. Scrap metal dealer registration — Disclosure of conviction — Effect of conviction — Expiration — Place of business.

Except as provided in subsection (f), no dealer shall purchase, deal, or otherwise engage in the scrap metal business unless the dealer is registered with the department.

Any registration under this chapter expires two (2) years from the date of the registration or the renewal of the registration.

The commissioner may promulgate and adopt rules that are reasonably necessary to carry out this chapter. The commissioner shall establish registration and renewal fees that are adequate to cover the administrative costs associated with the registration program.

Included on each registration and renewal form must be a section in which the registrant declares, under penalty of perjury pursuant to § 39-16-702(a)(3), whether the registrant has ever been convicted of a violation of this chapter or convicted of the criminal offense of theft, burglary or vandalism, where the offense involves scrap metal. If the registrant is a legally cognizable organization or entity, convictions of theft, burglary or vandalism, where the offense involves scrap metal, by any member, as defined in title 48, of the organization or entity must be disclosed on the application. Convictions of theft, burglary or vandalism, where the offense involves scrap metal, by members of organizations or entities constitute convictions by the registrant for purposes of subsection (c).

A registrant who has been convicted of a violation of this chapter or has a conviction for the criminal offense of theft, burglary or vandalism, where the offense involves scrap metal, is prohibited from registering under this chapter for five (5) years from the date of conviction.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a registration issued pursuant to this chapter does not expire immediately upon the death of the registrant. The registration continues to be effective for the locations designated in the registration for a period of at least sixty (60) days after the death of the registrant. The sixty-day period may be extended by the commissioner for good cause.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a registration issued pursuant to this chapter expires upon notification to the department that the registrant is no longer in business at the registered location.

Notwithstanding subsection (a):

Nothing in this chapter requires an employee of a registered scrap metal dealer to secure a registration under this chapter as long as the employee remains an employee of the registered scrap metal dealer; and

Nothing in this chapter prohibits a registered scrap metal dealer from employing another registered scrap metal dealer.

A registered scrap metal dealer shall list each place of business within this state with reference to its specific location, upon registration and upon subsequent renewals of the registration.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1; 2012, ch. 969, § 5; 2013, ch. 271, § 1; 2017, ch. 414, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2012, ch. 969, § 8 provided that the commissioner of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-9-103. Copying and recording required identification of sellers of scrap metal — Scrap metal transaction record requirements — Alternative forms of identification.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), no scrap metal dealer may purchase or otherwise acquire scrap metal from a person unless that person presents a state or federally issued photo identification card that appears valid on its face to the dealer and provides a thumbprint as provided in § 62-9-104.

If a valid state or federally issued photo identification card is presented, the scrap metal dealer shall record the name, sex, height, date of birth, residence address and the photo identification card number of the person selling the scrap metal, photocopy the photo identification card presented and maintain this information as part of the transaction record. The scrap metal dealer shall also record the license plate number and make and model of the motor vehicle the seller is driving. If the vehicle is a commercial vehicle, the buyer shall record the name of the business owning or leasing the vehicle.

If the person presenting the scrap metal for sale does not have a state or federally issued photo identification card, the dealer shall require the seller to present some form of state or federally issued identification, photograph the person and record the information contained on the identification card prior to the transaction being made. Even if a photograph of the seller is taken, the dealer is prohibited from making the transaction if the seller does not have, or refuses to present, the required identification.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

62-9-104. Taking of thumbprint impression — Scrap metal transaction records — Due diligence — Payment procedures — Vouchers — Dealer fees for administrative costs — Age restriction on sellers.

Upon copying and recording the photo or other required identification and the information contained on the identification of the person proposing to sell scrap metal as required in § 62-9-103, the dealer shall also require the person to provide a right thumbprint impression. However, if taking the right thumbprint is not possible, the dealer shall take a fingerprint from the left thumb or another finger and shall identify on the transaction sheet which finger has been used. A thumb or fingerprint taken pursuant to this subsection (a) must be clear and complete and contain no smears or smudges. A thumb or fingerprint taken pursuant to this subsection (a) shall be maintained by the dealer for a period of three (3) years from the date of the scrap metal sale.

Before purchasing scrap metal from a person, the dealer shall conduct a reasonably diligent inquiry, based upon the seller, type and quantity of metal offered for sale and other circumstances surrounding the transaction, to determine whether the person selling or delivering the scrap metal has a legal right to do so and whether a lawful transaction may be made. If the person presents a bill of sale, receipt or other document indicating that the person is in lawful possession of the scrap metal or it was otherwise lawfully acquired, the dealer shall photocopy the document and maintain it with the transaction information otherwise required by this section.

In addition to identifying information required to be maintained by a dealer pursuant to § 62-9-103, the dealer shall also maintain transaction records of each purchase by date of purchase, name of seller, the amount paid for the scrap metal and the weight of each kind of scrap metal. A detailed description of the metal being purchased shall also be maintained using the uniform terminology developed by the department. The entries shall be made in chronological order of sale from day to day, as the business is transacted.

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2), if it appears that the person is in lawful possession of the scrap metal and buying or otherwise receiving the metal from the seller would not violate this chapter, payment may take place by any method, on site, and at the time of the transaction.

If the person is offering for sale scrap metal that, in whole or in part, consists of copper or an unattached catalytic converter, the transaction must occur in accordance with this subdivision (c)(2).

If the person selling scrap metal specified in this subdivision (c)(2) is selling as an agent or employee of a business, payment for the metal shall be made only by check or money order, mailed to the business address of the business for whom the employee or agent is employed, and the payee on the check shall be the name of the business.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(2)(B)(i), a business that sells the type of scrap metal specified in this subdivision (c)(2) on a regular or frequent basis may annually preregister with a scrap metal dealer a list of employees who are authorized to sell on behalf of the business. A scrap metal dealer may pay an authorized, preregistered employee by any method, on site, and at the time of the transaction.

If the person selling scrap metal specified in this subdivision (c)(2) is not an employee or agent of a business, payment for the scrap metal shall be by check, money order or voucher, at the option of the seller.

(a) If the seller elects payment by check or money order, it shall be mailed to the physical address provided on the driver license the seller used for identification. If the seller did not produce a driver license with a physical address on it, payment shall be by voucher.

(ii) (a) If the seller elects payment by check or money order, it shall be mailed to the physical address provided on the driver license the seller used for identification. If the seller did not produce a driver license with a physical address on it, payment shall be by voucher.

If a voucher is not redeemed by an authorized person within six (6) months of the date of the transaction, the voucher expires and may no longer be honored by the dealer after the expiration date. The dealer shall have one (1) year from the date of the voucher's expiration to transmit the transaction amount to the department for use in the administration of this chapter. Unredeemed voucher funds may be transmitted to the department in the same manner as dealer registration and renewal fees.

If the seller elects payment by voucher, or if payment must be by voucher, the dealer shall give the seller a voucher for the amount of metal purchased. The voucher shall include the same information required under subdivision (b)(2) and the date on which the voucher can be redeemed. The voucher may only be redeemed by the person whose name appears on the voucher as the seller or by the person's heirs or legal representative. No voucher may be redeemed by the voucher holder or the holder's heirs or legal representative sooner than five (5) days from the date of the scrap metal transaction.

The department shall, by rule, establish a reasonable fee a dealer may charge the person selling the scrap metal for the dealer's administrative costs of processing and issuing any check required by this part. The fee may vary according to the dollar value of the purchase or the weight of the purchase, but shall, in no event, exceed five dollars ($5.00) per check.

No dealer shall purchase or receive, or otherwise acquire, any scrap metal from a person under eighteen (18) years of age, whether the metal is acquired directly from, through or by the aid of the minor.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Penalty for failure to secure information identifying seller, § 62-9-106.

62-9-105. Maintenance of scrap metal transaction records — Inspection of scrap metals and records by law enforcement or commissioner — Search warrant.

As used in this section, “scrap metal transaction record” includes the information required to be obtained by §§ 62-9-103(b) and 62-9-104(b)(2).

A dealer shall be required to maintain each scrap metal transaction record for a period of three (3) years following the transaction.

During the usual and customary business hours of a scrap metal dealer, a law enforcement officer or the commissioner shall have the right to inspect, without a warrant or subpoena, either of the following:

Any purchased scrap metals in the possession of the dealer; and

Any records required to be maintained by the dealer pursuant to this chapter.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1), a search warrant or judicial subpoena may be executed at any time for inspection of the items set out in subdivision (c)(1).

All records required to be made available pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) shall be maintained on the site where the transaction occurred for a period of three (3) years from the date of the transaction.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1; 2012, ch. 969, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2012, ch. 969, § 8 provided that the commissioner of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Failing to provide information concerning certain sellers a violation of chapter, § 62-9-104.

Penalties for failure to secure information identifying seller, § 62-9-106.

Purchasing from minors a violation of chapter, § 62-9-104.

62-9-106. Offense to sell or for dealer to purchase certain types of scrap metal — Exceptions — Uniform scrap metal marking system — Committee to develop marking system — Violations — Prosecution for other offenses.

Except as provided in subsection (b), it is an offense to knowingly sell or attempt to sell to a scrap metal dealer or for a scrap metal dealer to knowingly purchase or attempt to purchase the following types of scrap metal:

Scrap metal marked with the initials of an electric, telephone, cable or other public utility or an electric or telephone cooperative;

Utility access covers;

Street light poles and fixtures;

Road and bridge guard rails;

Highway or street signs;

Water meter covers;

Traffic directional and control signs;

Traffic light signals;

Any scrap metal visibly marked or painted with the name of a government entity, business, company or the name of the owner of the metal;

Property owned by a telephone, cable, electric, water or other utility, an electric or telephone cooperative or a railroad, and marked or otherwise identified as such; and

Unused and undamaged historical markers or grave markers and vases.

It is an exception to application of this section that the person attempting to sell the scrap metal provides reasonable, written documentation that the seller is the owner of the scrap metal or is an employee, agent or other person authorized to sell the scrap metal on behalf of the owner. The dealer shall make a photo copy of any documentation provided pursuant to this subsection (b) and retain the copy as part of the transaction record.

In order for this section to apply to items of scrap metal covered by subdivision (a)(9), the scrap metal must be marked or painted in accordance with a uniform scrap metal marking system to be devised by the department as part of its rules and regulations. In devising the marking system, the department may consult with, or request recommendations from, other state or local government departments or private companies that currently mark property. The commissioner may also appoint a committee to develop the uniform scrap metal marking system. If so appointed, the committee shall consist of at least five (5) members but no more than seven (7) members with at least one (1) member selected from each of the following groups: the scrap metal industry, the Tennessee Association of Chiefs of Police, the Tennessee Sheriffs' Association, the Home Builders Association of Tennessee, and a member of the public who is not engaged in law enforcement, the scrap metal industry or the home building industry.

Any person selling or attempting to sell metal to a scrap metal dealer in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless the value of the metal, in its original and undamaged condition, in addition to any costs which are, or would be, incurred in repairing or in the attempt to recover any property damaged in the theft or removal of such metal, is in an aggregate amount which exceeds five hundred dollars ($500), in which case such person shall be guilty of a Class E felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished only by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Any scrap metal dealer purchasing or attempting to purchase scrap metal in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a person violating this section from also being prosecuted for theft or any other applicable offense.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1; 2012, ch. 969, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2012, ch. 969, § 8 provided that the commissioner of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for a Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Record of purchase required, § 62-9-101.

62-9-107. Offense of purchase by dealer of air conditioner evaporator coil or condenser for cash or for making payment at time of sale — Sale only by certain agents, representatives or employees — Required documentation — Payment requirements — Violation — Prosecution for other offenses.

It is an offense for a scrap metal dealer to pay cash to a person who presents an air conditioner evaporator coil or condenser, in whole or in part, for sale as scrap or for the dealer to make payment of any kind at the time of the transaction.

Scrap metal described in subsection (a) may only be sold for scrap by an authorized agent, representative or employee of one of the following:

A licensed HVAC contractor who acquired the evaporator coil or condenser in the performance of contracting as defined in § 62-6-102;

In a jurisdiction exempt from the requirements of title 68, chapter 120, pursuant to § 68-120-101, a company meeting all local or municipal requirements to obtain a permit from that jurisdiction to repair, replace and install HVAC units containing copper evaporator coils or condensers;

In a jurisdiction exempt from the requirements of title 68, chapter 120, pursuant to § 68-120-101, where the exempt jurisdiction does not require a permit to repair, replace and install HVAC units containing copper evaporator coils or condensers, a company holding a current business tax license, with a Class 4 classification, or a current sales tax identification number indicating the business as that of an HVAC installer or repairer; or

In a jurisdiction not exempt from the requirements of title 68, chapter 120, a company holding a current business tax license, with a Class 4 classification, or a current sales tax identification number indicating the business as that of an HVAC installer or repairer.

The person offering the air conditioner evaporator coil or condenser for sale as scrap shall have in the person's possession documentation that the company for whom it is being sold is a company described in subsection (b), and that the person selling the evaporator coil or condenser is an authorized agent, representative or employee of that company.

Payment for scrap metal described in subsection (a) must be made by check or money order, mailed to the business address of the company for whom the metal is being sold and the name of the company must be the payee on the check.

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor punishable by fine only.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a person violating this section from also being prosecuted for any applicable criminal offense.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Cross-Reference. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-9-108. Offense of purchasing or possessing metal beer kegs — Violation — Prosecution for other offenses.

No scrap metal dealer shall knowingly purchase or possess a metal beer keg, whether damaged or undamaged, or any reasonably recognizable part of a metal beer keg, on any premises that the dealer uses to buy, sell, store, shred, melt, cut or otherwise alter scrap metal.

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor punishable by fine only.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a person violating this section from also being prosecuted for any applicable criminal offense.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Cross-Reference. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-9-109. Offense of engaging in business of buying scrap metal without registration — Other offenses — Violations.

It is an offense for a person to engage in the business of buying scrap metal without registering as a scrap metal dealer with the department or falsely registering with the department as a dealer.

A person engaged in the business of buying scrap metal, as a registered scrap metal dealer or otherwise, commits an offense who knowingly:

Purchases scrap metal:

That was not property of the seller and the seller did not have the authorization to sell the metal; or

That was unlawfully obtained by the seller; or

Commits any other act in violation of this chapter.

A violation of subsection (a) or (b) is a Class A misdemeanor, punishable only by fine, unless the value of the metal, in its original and undamaged condition, in addition to any costs which are, or would be, incurred in repairing or in the attempt to recover any property damaged in the theft or removal of such metal, is in an aggregate amount which exceeds five hundred dollars ($500). In such instance, such scrap metal dealer shall be guilty of a Class E felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished only by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

It is an offense for a person to sell or attempt to sell scrap metal knowing that the metal is stolen, whether by the person selling or by some other person.

A violation of subdivision (d)(1) shall be punished as theft and graded according to the value of the metal sold or attempted to be sold as provided in § 39-14-105.

In determining the value of the metal sold or attempted to be sold for purposes of grading in subdivision (d)(2), the metal shall be valued in its original and undamaged condition, in addition to any costs which are, or would be, incurred in repairing or in the attempt to recover any property damaged in the theft or removal of such metal and not the amount by which the defendant sold or attempted to sell the metal.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1; 2012, ch. 969, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2012, ch. 969, § 8 provided that the commissioner of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-Reference. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

62-9-110. Revocation of registration upon conviction of violations — Denial of application or suspension, revocation, or refusal to issue or renew registration by commissioner — Civil penalty.

The scrap metal registration of a person convicted of a violation of this chapter, or the criminal offense of theft, burglary or vandalism if the offense involved scrap metal, shall be immediately revoked by operation of law upon conviction. A copy of the judgment of conviction shall be transmitted to the commissioner by the law enforcement agency responsible for the conviction.

The commissioner may deny an application for registration or may suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew any registration issued under this chapter upon finding that the holder or applicant is guilty of any violation enumerated in § 62-9-114(a) or any rule properly promulgated by the commissioner. In addition to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action under this section, the commissioner may assess a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation. Each day of continued violation constitutes a separate violation.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1; 2012, ch. 969, § 7; 2018, ch. 745, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2012, ch. 969, § 8 provided that the commissioner of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-9-111. Sales of donated scrap metal by governmental entities, regulated landfills and solid waste processing facilities — Payment requirements — Registration of governmental entities, regulated landfills, or solid waste processing facilities as scrap metal dealers.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a governmental entity, regulated landfill or solid waste processing facility owner from selling any scrap metal donated to it or otherwise lawfully obtained by it without compensation.

Payment for scrap metal sold by a governmental entity or regulated landfill owner shall be:

Made by check or money order to the governmental entity or the owner of the landfill or solid waste processing facility;

The check or money order shall be mailed to the business address of the governmental entity or the owner of the landfill or solid waste processing facility; and

The payee on the check shall be in the name of the governmental entity or the owner of the landfill or solid waste processing facility.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a governmental entity, regulated landfill or solid waste processing facility owner from registering as a scrap metal dealer as provided in this chapter and coming within § 62-9-112.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

62-9-112. Application of chapter to sales between registered scrap metal dealers.

This chapter shall not apply to scrap metal transactions that take place between a scrap metal dealer registered pursuant to this chapter and another registered dealer; provided, that the scrap metal is lawfully obtained by the seller and, at the time of the transaction, may lawfully be sold for scrap. The terms of sale between two (2) registered dealers shall be determined by the parties.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

62-9-113. Emergency rules — Committee for development of uniform terminology.

The department is authorized to promulgate emergency rules to implement this chapter.

As part of the rules promulgated pursuant to this section, the commissioner shall develop uniform terminology to describe the types of metal most commonly sold as scrap. The commissioner may appoint a committee to develop the uniform terminology. The committee shall consist of at least five (5) members but no more than seven (7) members with at least one (1) member selected from each of the following groups: the scrap metal industry, the Tennessee Association of Chiefs of Police, the Tennessee Sheriffs' Association, the Home Builders Association of Tennessee and a member of the public who is not engaged in law enforcement, the scrap metal industry or the home building industry. The purpose of uniform terminology is to increase the chances of locating and recovering stolen scrap metal by enabling law enforcement officials to describe the stolen metal in their theft report in the same terms as the scrap metal industry uses to describe the same metal when it is brought in for sale.

Acts 2008, ch. 690, § 4; 2009, ch. 566, § 12; 2013, ch. 211, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 9, §§ 62-9-101 — 62-9-106 (Acts 1903, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; Shan., §§ 3608a100-3608a104; Code 1932, §§ 6751-6755; Acts 1953, ch. 42, § 1; 1968, ch. 602, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 104, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-901 — 62-908; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning junk dealers, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2008, ch. 690, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

62-9-114. Investigation of unregistered activity.

The commissioner is authorized to investigate, and shall investigate upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, a scrap metal dealer for an alleged violation of an unregistered activity pursuant to § 62-9-102, purchase restrictions pursuant to §§ 62-9-106 and 62-9-107 or payment restrictions pursuant to §§ 62-9-104(c) and 62-9-107(d); provided, that a written complaint shall require evidence, documentary or otherwise, presented in connection with the written complaint, that makes out a prima facie case of a violation of unregistered activity, or purchase restrictions, or payment restrictions as determined by the commissioner.

If, after investigation, the commissioner finds a scrap metal dealer to be in violation of any of the statutes enumerated in subsection (a), then the commissioner shall notify the dealer in writing of the dealer's right to a hearing prior to imposing any sanction permitted under this chapter. If the dealer fails to notify the commissioner in writing within ten (10) days from the date of the commissioner's notice that the dealer seeks a hearing, then such hearing shall be waived and the commissioner may impose upon the dealer any sanction or discipline permitted by this chapter. All hearings conducted pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

In the event the matter contained in the complaint has been filed or made a part of a case pending in any court in this state, the commissioner may withhold its investigation or decision until the court action has been concluded.

Acts 2012, ch. 969, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 969, § 8 provided that the commissioner of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-9-115. [Repealed.]

Acts 2016, ch. 789, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 414, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former section § 62-9-115 concerned fees.

62-9-116. Violation by employee.

Any violation of this chapter committed by an employee of a registered scrap metal dealer while acting within the scope of employment constitutes a violation by that dealer for purposes of enforcement of this chapter.

Acts 2017, ch. 414, § 3.